Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.040

Service of complaint and notice.

The complaint and notice shall be served at least five days before the time mentioned in the notice for the defendant to appear and answer the complaint, by delivering to the defendant, or leaving at his or her place of abode, with some person over twelve years of age, a true copy of the complaint and notice.

[ 2010 c 8 s 3003; 1925 ex.s. c 181 s 1; Code 1881 s 1715; 1873 p 337 s 22; RRS s 1761.]